Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-914
Order, defined.

Every direction of a court or judge, made or entered in writing and not included in a judgment, is an order.

R.S.1867, Code § 578, p. 495;

R.S.1913, § 7730;

C.S.1922, § 8674;

C.S.1929, § 20-914;

R.S.1943, § 25-914.

A docket entry/journal entry contained in the "Judges Notes" constituted an interlocutory order disposing of the
party's motion to alter or amend; it did not need to be a separate file-stamped document. Pearce v. Mutual of Omaha
Ins. Co., 28 Neb. App. 410, 945 N.W.2d 516 (2020).

An unsigned journal entry without a file stamp can constitute an interlocutory order; but it cannot constitute a
final, appealable order, particularly when it does not dispose of all issues. Pearce v. Mutual of Omaha Ins. Co., 28
Neb. App. 410, 945 N.W.2d 516 (2020).